Hawaii statutes.
§486J-3 Statements. Each month, every refiner
and distributor, on a reporting date established by the director, shall file
with the research and economic analysis division of the department, on forms
furnished by the department showing separately for each county and for the
islands of Lanai and Molokai within which and whereon fuel is sold or used
during the last preceding reporting month, the following:

(1) The total volume of fuel imported into and
exported from Hawaii, and if for ultimate sale or consumption in another county
or on another island, the total volume of fuel, in barrels, by import location
(foreign and domestic), by specific crude oil imported, and by liquid fuel
type, aviation fuel, diesel fuel, biofuels, and other types of fuel as required
by the department, that is sold, exchanged, or otherwise transferred or used by
the distributor;

(2) The total volume of fuel refined, manufactured,
or compounded by refineries, in barrels, by company, and by specific crude oil
and by liquid fuel type, aviation fuel, diesel fuel, biofuels, and other types
of fuel as required by the department, including No. 2 diesel fuel, No. 1
distillate, No. 2 fuel oil, No. 4 fuel oil, kerosene, finished aviation
gasoline, kerosene-type jet fuel, residual fuel oil, consumer grade propane,
and gasoline (regular, midgrade, and premium);

(3) The total volume of fuel distributed, in barrels,
by company, by island, and by liquid fuel type, aviation fuel, diesel fuel,
biofuels, and other types of fuel as required by the department, and by:

(A) Classes of retail trade;

(B) Federal, state, county agencies, ships
stores, or base exchanges, commercial agriculture accounts, commercial
non-agriculture accounts, retail dealers, and other customers as required by
the department; and

(C) Wholesale distributor; and

(4) The total volume of inventory and storage
capacity, in barrels, by reporting entity, by method of transportation of
receipts and distribution, by specific crude oil, and by liquid fuel type,
aviation fuel, diesel fuel, biofuels, and other types of fuel as required by
the department. [L 1997, c 257, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 77, §4; am L 2006, c 78,
§5; am L 2007, c 182, §4; am L 2010, c 152, §4]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next